Oklahoma, session 2026, SB401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1239 of Title 69, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A traffic control contractor or subcontractor who provides
traffic control services to the Department of Transportation shall
not be liable to a claimant for personal injury, property damage, or
death arising from the performance of the traffic control services
if, at the time of the personal injury, property damage, or death,
the traffic control contractor or subcontractor is in compliance
with all applicable safety regulations provided by the Department
related to the condition or defect that was the proximate cause of
the personal injury, property damage, or death.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB401 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
February 17, 2025 - DO PASS






















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB401 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)